Illinois, session 104th, HB2403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 3. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1118 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1118 new)8    Sec. 605-1118. Megaproject building materials exemption.9    (a) The Department may certify a taxpayer for an exemption 10from any State or local use tax or retailers' occupation tax on 11building materials that will be incorporated into real estate 12at a megaproject site. The taxpayer must meet all of the 13criteria for certification set forth in Division 22 of Article 1410 of the Property Tax Code. This certification is in addition 15to and does not replace or amend the megaproject certificate 16under Division 22 of Article 10 of the Property Tax Code. The 17Department shall not issue exemptions under this Section after 18December 31, 2031. 19    (b) The Department shall determine the period during which 20the exemption from State and local use taxes and retailers' 21occupation taxes is in effect, but in no event shall the 22initial period exceed 10 years. The certificate may be renewed 23for a period not to exceed 5 years. Upon certification by the   HB2403- 2 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1Department under this Section, the Department shall notify the 2Department of Revenue of the certification. The exemption 3status shall take effect within 3 months after certification 4of the taxpayer and notice to the Department of Revenue by the 5Department. 6    (c) If the Department determines, in accordance with the 7Administrative Review Law and the Illinois Administrative 8Procedure Act, that the taxpayer is not in compliance with 9Division 22 of Article 10 of the Property Tax Code, the 10Department shall revoke the certification under this Section 11by written notice to the taxpayer. The Department shall 12transmit a copy of the revocation to the Department of 13Revenue. If the taxpayer's certification is revoked, the 14taxpayer must repay any exempted amount of State or local use 15tax or retailers' occupation tax. 16    (d) The Department may adopt rules as are reasonable and 17necessary to implement the provisions of this Section. 18    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 1912 as follows: 20    (35 ILCS 105/12)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.12)21    Sec. 12. Applicability of Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 22and Uniform Penalty and Interest Act. All of the provisions of 23Sections 1d, 1e, 1f, 1i, 1j, 1j.1, 1k, 1m, 1n, 1o, 2-6, 2-12, 242-28, 2-29, 2-54, 2a, 2b, 2c, 3, 4 (except that the time   HB2403- 3 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1limitation provisions shall run from the date when the tax is 2due rather than from the date when gross receipts are 3received), 5 (except that the time limitation provisions on 4the issuance of notices of tax liability shall run from the 5date when the tax is due rather than from the date when gross 6receipts are received and except that in the case of a failure 7to file a return required by this Act, no notice of tax 8liability shall be issued on and after each July 1 and January 91 covering tax due with that return during any month or period 10more than 6 years before that July 1 or January 1, 11respectively), 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5h, 5j, 5k, 5l, 5m, 125n, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 12 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 13and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, which 14are not inconsistent with this Act, shall apply, as far as 15practicable, to the subject matter of this Act to the same 16extent as if such provisions were included herein.17(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 18103-595, eff. 6-26-24.) 19    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 20Section 12 as follows: 21    (35 ILCS 110/12)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.42)22    Sec. 12. Applicability of Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 23and Uniform Penalty and Interest Act. All of the provisions of 24Sections 1d, 1e, 1f, 1i, 1j, 1j.1, 1k, 1m, 1n, 1o, 2-6, 2-12,   HB2403- 4 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b12-28, 2-29, 2-54, 2a, 2b, 2c, 3 (except as to the disposition 2by the Department of the money collected under this Act), 4 3(except that the time limitation provisions shall run from the 4date when gross receipts are received), 5 (except that the 5time limitation provisions on the issuance of notices of tax 6liability shall run from the date when the tax is due rather 7than from the date when gross receipts are received and except 8that in the case of a failure to file a return required by this 9Act, no notice of tax liability shall be issued on and after 10July 1 and January 1 covering tax due with that return during 11any month or period more than 6 years before that July 1 or 12January 1, respectively), 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5j, 5k, 135l, 5m, 5n, 6d, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 12 of the Retailers' 14Occupation Tax Act which are not inconsistent with this Act, 15and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, shall 16apply, as far as practicable, to the subject matter of this Act 17to the same extent as if such provisions were included herein.18(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 19103-595, eff. 6-26-24.) 20    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 21changing Section 12 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 115/12)  (from Ch. 120, par. 439.112)23    Sec. 12. All of the provisions of Sections 1d, 1e, 1f, 1i, 241j, 1j.1, 1k, 1m, 1n, 1o, 2-6, 2-12, 2-28, 2-29, 2-54, 2a, 2b,   HB2403- 5 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b12c, 3 (except as to the disposition by the Department of the 2tax collected under this Act), 4 (except that the time 3limitation provisions shall run from the date when the tax is 4due rather than from the date when gross receipts are 5received), 5 (except that the time limitation provisions on 6the issuance of notices of tax liability shall run from the 7date when the tax is due rather than from the date when gross 8receipts are received), 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5j, 5k, 5l, 95m, 5n, 6d, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 of the Retailers' 10Occupation Tax Act which are not inconsistent with this Act, 11and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act shall 12apply, as far as practicable, to the subject matter of this Act 13to the same extent as if such provisions were included herein.14(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 15103-595, eff. 6-26-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 16    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 17by adding Section 2-28 as follows: 18    (35 ILCS 120/2-28 new)19    Sec. 2-28. Megaproject building materials exemption.20    (a) Each retailer that makes a qualified sale of building 21materials to be incorporated into real estate at a megaproject 22site certified by the Department of Commerce and Economic 23Opportunity under Section 605-1115 of the Department of 24Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil   HB2403- 6 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1Administrative Code of Illinois may deduct receipts from such 2sales when calculating the tax imposed by this Act. 3Megaproject Building Materials Exemption Certificates shall be 4issued for an initial period not to exceed 10 years and can be 5renewed for a period not to exceed 5 years. 6    (b) No retailer who is eligible for the deduction or 7credit for a given sale under Section 5k of this Act related to 8enterprise zones, Section 5l of this Act related to High 9Impact Businesses, Section 5m of this Act related to REV 10Illinois projects, or Section 5n of this Act related to MICRO 11facilities shall be eligible for the deduction or credit 12authorized under this Section for that same sale. 13    (c) A construction contractor or other entity shall not 14make tax-free purchases unless it has an active Exemption 15Certificate issued by the Department at the time of the 16purchase. 17    (d) The megaproject administrator shall submit a request 18to the Department for an initial certification or renewal of 19the Megaproject Building Materials Exemption Certificate. Upon 20request from the megaproject administrator, the Department 21shall issue a Megaproject Building Materials Exemption 22Certificate for each construction contractor or other entity 23identified by the megaproject administrator. The Department 24shall make the Megaproject Building Materials Exemption 25Certificates available to each construction contractor or 26other entity identified by the megaproject administrator and   HB2403- 7 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1to the megaproject administrator. The request for Megaproject 2Building Materials Exemption Certificates under this Section 3must include the following information: 4        (1) the name and address of the construction 5    contractor or other entity; 6        (2) the name and location or address of the building 7    project site; 8        (3) the estimated amount of the exemption for each 9    construction contractor or other entity for which a 10    request for a Megaproject Building Materials Exemption 11    Certificate is made, based on a stated estimated average 12    tax rate and the percentage of the contract that consists 13    of materials; 14        (4) the period of time during which supplies for the 15    project are expected to be purchased; and 16        (5) other reasonable information as the Department may 17    require, including, but not limited to, FEIN numbers, to 18    determine if the contractor or other entity, or any 19    partner, corporate officer, or, in the case of a limited 20    liability company, any manager or member of the 21    construction contractor or other entity is or has been the 22    owner, partner, corporate officer, or, in the case of a 23    limited liability company, manager or member of a person 24    that is in default for moneys due to the Department under 25    this Act or any other tax or fee Act administered by the 26    Department.   HB2403- 8 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1    The Department, in its discretion, may require that the 2request for a Megaproject Building Materials Exemption 3Certificate be submitted electronically. The Department may, 4in its discretion, issue Exemption Certificates 5electronically. 6    (e) To document the exemption allowed under this Section, 7the retailer must obtain from the purchaser the certification 8required under this Section, which must contain the 9Megaproject Building Materials Exemption Certificate number 10issued to the purchaser by the Department. In addition, the 11retailer must obtain certification from the purchaser that 12contains: 13        (1) a statement that the building materials are being 14    purchased for incorporation into real estate located in a 15    megaproject site; 16        (2) the location or address of the real estate into 17    which the building materials will be incorporated; 18        (3) the name of the megaproject in which that real 19    estate is located; 20        (4) a description of the building materials being 21    purchased; 22        (5) the purchaser's Megaproject Building Materials 23    Exemption Certificate number issued by the Department; and 24        (6) the purchaser's signature and date of purchase. 25    (f) The Department shall issue the Megaproject Building 26Materials Exemption Certificates within 3 business days after   HB2403- 9 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1receipt of the request from the megaproject administrator. 2This requirement does not apply if the Department, for 3reasonable cause, is unable to issue the Exemption Certificate 4within 3 business days. The Department may refuse to issue a 5Megaproject Building Materials Exemption Certificate if the 6owner, any partner, or a corporate officer, and in the case of 7a limited liability company, any manager or member, of the 8construction contractor or other entity is or has been the 9owner, a partner, a corporate officer, and in the case of a 10limited liability company, a manager or member, of a person 11that is in default for moneys due to the Department under this 12Act or any other tax or fee Act administered by the Department. 13    (g) The Megaproject Building Materials Exemption 14Certificate shall contain: 15        (1) a unique identifying number that shall be designed 16    in such a way that the Department can identify from the 17    unique number on the Exemption Certificate issued to a 18    given construction contractor or other entity, the name of 19    the megaproject site and the construction contractor or 20    other entity to whom the Exemption Certificate is issued; 21        (2) the name of the construction contractor or entity 22    to whom the Exemption Certificate is issued; 23        (3) issuance date, effective date, and expiration 24    date; and 25        (4) language stating that, if the construction 26    contractor or other entity who is issued the Exemption   HB2403- 10 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1    Certificate makes a tax-exempt purchase, as described in 2    this Section, that is not eligible for exemption under 3    this Section or allows another person to make a tax-exempt 4    purchase, as described in this Section, that is not 5    eligible for exemption under this Section, then, in 6    addition to any tax or other penalty imposed, the 7    construction contractor or other entity is subject to a 8    penalty equal to the tax that would have been paid by the 9    retailer under this Act as well as any applicable local 10    retailers' occupation tax on the purchase that is not 11    eligible for the exemption. 12    (h) After the Department issues Exemption Certificates for 13a given megaproject, the megaproject administrator may notify 14the Department of additional construction contractors or other 15entities that are eligible for a Megaproject Building 16Materials Exemption Certificate. Upon receiving such a 17notification and subject to the other provisions of this 18Section, the Department shall issue a Megaproject Building 19Materials Exemption Certificate to each additional 20construction contractor or other entity so identified. 21    (i) A megaproject administrator may ask the Department to 22rescind a Megaproject Building Materials Exemption Certificate 23previously issued by the Department to a construction 24contractor or other entity working at that certified 25megaproject site if that Megaproject Building Materials 26Exemption Certificate has not yet expired. Upon receiving such   HB2403- 11 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1a request and subject to the other provisions of this Section, 2the Department shall issue the rescission of the Megaproject 3Building Materials Exemption Certificate to the construction 4contractor or other entity identified by the megaproject 5administrator and provide a copy of the rescission to the 6construction contractor or other entity and to the megaproject 7administrator. 8    (j) If the Department of Revenue determines that a 9construction contractor or other entity that was issued an 10Exemption Certificate under this Section made a tax-exempt 11purchase, as described in this Section, that was not eligible 12for exemption under this Section or allowed another person to 13make a tax-exempt purchase, as described in this Section, that 14was not eligible for exemption under this Section, then, in 15addition to any tax or other penalty imposed, the construction 16contractor or other entity is subject to a penalty equal to the 17tax that would have been paid by the retailer under this Act as 18well as any applicable local retailers' occupation tax on the 19purchase that was not eligible for the exemption. 20    (k) Each contractor or other entity that has been issued a 21Megaproject Building Materials Exemption Certificate under 22this Section shall annually report to the Department the total 23value of the Megaproject building materials exemption from 24State taxes. Reports shall contain information reasonably 25required by the Department to enable it to verify and 26calculate the total tax benefits for taxes imposed by the   HB2403- 12 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1State and shall be broken down by megaproject site. Reports 2are due no later than May 31 of each year and shall cover the 3previous calendar year. Failure to report data may result in 4revocation of the Megaproject Building Materials Exemption 5Certificate issued to the contractor or other entity. The 6Department is authorized to adopt rules governing revocation 7determinations, including the length of revocation. Factors to 8be considered in revocations shall include, but are not 9limited to, prior compliance with the reporting requirements, 10cooperation in discontinuing and correcting violations, and 11whether the certificate was used unlawfully during the 12preceding year. The Department, in its discretion, may require 13that the reports filed under this Section be submitted 14electronically. 15    (l) The Department shall have the authority to adopt rules 16as are reasonable and necessary to implement the provisions of 17this Section. 18    (m) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 192-70. 20    (n) This exemption applies to the Use Tax Act, the Service 21Use Tax Act, and the Service Occupation Tax Act and is 22incorporated by reference in Section 12 of each of those 23respective Acts. 24    (o) As used in this Section: 25    "Qualified sale" means a sale of building materials that 26will be incorporated into real estate as part of a building   HB2403- 13 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1project for which a Megaproject Building Materials Exemption 2Certificate has been issued to the purchaser by the 3Department.  4    Section 25. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Division 22 to Article 10 and changing as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 10 Div. 22 heading new)7Division 22. Megaprojects 8    (35 ILCS 200/10-910 new)9    Sec. 10-910. Megaproject Assessment Freeze and Payment 10Law; definitions. This Division 22 may be cited as the 11Megaproject Assessment Freeze and Payment Law.12    As used in this Division:13    "Assessment officer" means the chief county assessment 14officer of the county in which the megaproject is located. 15    "Assessment period" means the period beginning on the 16first day of the calendar year after the calendar year in which 17a megaproject is placed in service and ending on the date when 18the megaproject no longer qualifies as a megaproject under 19this Division. 20    "Base tax year" means the tax year prior to the first 21calendar year during which the Department issues a megaproject 22certificate under this Division. 23    "Base year" means:  HB2403- 14 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1        (1) the calendar year prior to the calendar year in 2    which the Department issues the megaproject certificate, 3    if the Department issues a megaproject certificate for a 4    project located on the property without granting 5    preliminary approval for the project pursuant to Section 6    10-940; or7        (2) the calendar year prior to the calendar year in 8    which the Department grants that preliminary approval, if 9    the Department grants preliminary approval pursuant to 10    Section 10-940 for a megaproject located on the property. 11    "Base year valuation" means the assessed value, in the 12base year, of the property comprising the megaproject. 13    "Company" means one or more entities whose aggregate 14investment in the megaproject meets the minimum investment 15required under this Division. The term "company" includes a 16company affiliate unless the context clearly indicates 17otherwise. 18    "Company affiliate" means an entity that joins with or is 19an affiliate of a company and that participates in the 20investment in, or financing of, a megaproject. 21    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 22Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 23Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 24services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 25average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 26    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic   HB2403- 15 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1Opportunity. 2    "Eligible costs" means all costs incurred by or on behalf 3of, or allocated to, a company, prior to the Department's 4issuance of the megaproject certificate or during the 5investment period, to create or construct a megaproject. 6"Eligible costs" includes, without limitation:7        (1) the purchase, site preparation, renovation, 8    rehabilitation, and construction of land, buildings, 9    structures, equipment, and furnishings used for or in the 10    megaproject;11        (2) any goods or services for the megaproject that are 12    purchased and capitalized under generally accepted 13    accounting principles, including any organizational costs 14    and research and development costs incurred in Illinois;15        (3) capitalized lease costs for land, buildings, 16    structures, and equipment valued at their present value 17    using the interest rate at which the company borrows funds 18    prevailing at the time the company entered into the lease;19        (4) infrastructure development costs;20        (5) debt service and project financing costs;21        (6) noncapitalized research and development costs;22        (7) job training and education costs;23        (8) lease and relocation costs; and24        (9) amounts expended by a company or company affiliate 25    as a nonresponsible party pursuant to a voluntary program 26    of site remediation, including amounts expended to obtain   HB2403- 16 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1    a No Further Remediation Letter from the Illinois 2    Environmental Protection Agency. 3    "Entity" means a sole proprietor, partnership, firm, 4corporation, limited liability company, association, or other 5business enterprise. 6    "Full-time employee" means an individual who is employed 7for consideration for at least 35 hours each week or who 8renders any other standard of service generally accepted by 9industry custom or practice as a full-time employee. An 10individual for whom a W-2 is issued by a professional employer 11organization is a full-time employee if he or she is employed 12in the service of the applicant for at least 35 hours each week 13or renders any other standard of service generally accepted by 14industry custom or practice as a full-time employment. An 15owner, operator, or tenant who employs labor or services at a 16specific site or facility under contract with another may 17declare one full-time job for every 1,820 man-hours worked per 18year under the contract. Vacations, paid holidays, and sick 19time are included in this computation, but overtime is not 20considered a part of regular hours. 21    "High Impact Business" means a project that has been 22designated by the Department as a High Impact Business under 23Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 24    "Incentive agreement" means an agreement between a 25company, a local municipality, and the taxing districts 26obligating the company to make the special payment under this   HB2403- 17 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1Division, in addition to paying property taxes, during the 2incentive period for a megaproject. 3    "Incentive period" means the period beginning on the first 4day of the calendar year after the calendar year in which the 5megaproject is placed in service and each calendar year 6thereafter until the earlier of (i) the expiration or 7termination of the incentive agreement or (ii) the revocation 8of the megaproject certificate. 9    "Inducement resolution" means a resolution adopted by the 10local municipality setting forth the commitment of the local 11municipality to enter into an incentive agreement. 12    "Investment period" means the period ending 7 years after 13the date on which the Department issues the megaproject 14certificate, or such other longer period of time as the local 15municipality, the taxing districts, and the company may agree 16to, not to exceed an initial period of 10 years. 17    "Local municipality" means the city, village, or 18incorporated town in which the megaproject is located or, if 19the megaproject is located in an unincorporated area, the 20county in which the megaproject is located. 21    "Megaproject" means the project set forth in the company's 22tax credit agreement or high impact business designation. 23    "Megaproject certificate" means a certificate issued by 24the Department that authorizes an assessment freeze as 25provided in this Division. 26    "Minimum investment" means an investment in the   HB2403- 18 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1megaproject of at least $100,000,000 in eligible costs within 2the investment period. 3    "Minority person" means a person who is a citizen or 4lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is any 5of the following: 6        (1) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 7    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 8    America, including Central America, and who maintains 9    tribal affiliation or community attachment). 10        (2) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 11    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 12    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 13    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan, 14    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam). 15        (3) Black or African American (a person having origins 16    in any of the black racial groups of Africa). 17        (4) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican, 18    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 19    culture or origin, regardless of race). 20        (5) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 21    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 22    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands). 23    "Minority-owned business" means a business that is at 24least 51% owned by one or more minority persons, or that, in 25the case of a corporation, has at least 51% of its stock owned 26by one or more minority persons, and that, in either case, is   HB2403- 19 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1managed and operated on a daily basis by one or more of the 2minority individuals who own the business. 3    "New full-time employee" means a full-time employee who 4first became employed by the owner, operator, contractor, or 5tenant of the megaproject during the incentive period or 6investment period and whose hiring results in a net increase 7in the owner, operator, contractor, or tenant's total number 8of full-time Illinois employees. 9    "New full-time employee" does not include: 10        (1) a person who was previously employed in Illinois 11    by the applicant or a related family member prior to the 12    onset of the investment or incentive period; or 13        (2) an individual who has a direct or indirect 14    ownership interest of at least 5% in the profits, capital, 15    or value of the applicant. 16    "Placed in service" means that the company has commenced 17its business operations at the megaproject site and has met 18its job creation requirements under this Section by hiring or 19causing to be hired at least 100 new full-time employees who 20provide support to the megaproject's business operations and 21work in the State of Illinois. If a company pauses or shuts 22down its business operations for a period of more than 30 days, 23then the megaproject shall no longer be considered placed in 24service. 25    "Project" means land, buildings, and other improvements on 26the land, including water facilities, sewage treatment and   HB2403- 20 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1disposal facilities, and all other machinery, apparatuses, 2equipment, office facilities, related infrastructure, and 3furnishings that are considered necessary, suitable, or useful 4by a company and comprise the megaproject, including all such 5property subject to assessment under the Property Tax Code. 6    "Special payment" means the annual amount paid in addition 7to property taxes paid during the incentive period as provided 8in the incentive agreement. 9    "Sports stadium" means a facility, stadium, arena, or 10other structure where athletic contests are held and sports 11teams practice and perform. 12    "Tax credit agreement" means an agreement entered into by 13the company and the Department under the Economic Development 14for Growing Economy Tax Credit Act, the Reimagining Energy and 15Vehicles in Illinois Act, or the Manufacturing Illinois Chips 16for Real Opportunity (MICRO) Act. 17    "Taxing district" has the meaning given to that term in 18Section 1-150. 19    "Termination date" means the last day of a calendar year 20that is no later than the 23rd year following the first 21calendar year in which a megaproject is placed in service. A 22company may apply to the local municipality and taxing 23districts prior to the termination date for an extension of 24the termination date beyond the 23rd year for up to 17 25additional years, for a total of 40 years. The corporate 26authorities of the local municipality and the taxing districts   HB2403- 21 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1shall approve an extension by resolution upon a finding of 2substantial public benefit. A copy of the resolution must be 3delivered to the Department within 30 days of the date the 4resolution was adopted. If the incentive agreement is 5terminated under Section 10-937, then the termination date is 6the date the agreement is terminated.  7    (35 ILCS 200/10-915 new)8    Sec. 10-915. Valuation during incentive period; 9eligibility.10    (a) Property that receives a megaproject certificate from 11the Department is eligible for an assessment freeze, as 12provided in this Division, eliminating from consideration, for 13assessment purposes during the incentive period, the value 14added to the property by the project and limiting the total 15valuation of the property during the incentive period to the 16base year valuation. If the company does not anticipate 17completing the project within the investment period, then the 18local municipality and taxing districts may approve one or 19more extensions of time to complete the project. However, the 20local municipality and taxing districts may not extend the 21project for a period that exceeds 5 years after the last day of 22the investment period. Unless approved as part of the original 23incentive agreement, the corporate authorities of the local 24municipality and taxing districts may approve an extension 25under this subsection by resolution, a copy of which must be   HB2403- 22 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1delivered to the Department within 30 days after the date the 2resolution is adopted.3    (b) To qualify for a megaproject certificate, the company 4must:5        (1) make the minimum investment in the megaproject 6    during the investment period; 7        (2) enter into an incentive agreement with the local 8    municipality and taxing districts as described in this 9    Division; 10        (3) enter into a project labor agreement with the 11    applicable local building trades council prior to the 12    commencement of any demolition, building construction, or 13    building renovation related to the megaproject; 14        (4) establish the goal of awarding 20% of the total 15    dollar amount of contracts that are related to the 16    megaproject and are awarded by the company during each 17    calendar year to minority-owned businesses; 18        (5) create at least 100 new full-time jobs as a result 19    of the megaproject; and 20        (6) have executed a tax credit agreement with the 21    Department or received a high impact business designation 22    from the Department. 23    (c) For purposes of this Division, if a single company 24enters into a financing arrangement of the type described in 25subsection (b) of Section 10-950, the investment in or 26financing of the property by a developer, lessor, financing   HB2403- 23 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1entity, or other third party in accordance with this 2arrangement is considered investment by the company. 3Investment by a related person to the company is considered 4investment by the company.  5    (35 ILCS 200/10-920 new)6    Sec. 10-920. Incentive agreement; assessment freeze for 7megaprojects; incentive period; inducement resolution; 8location of the project; criteria to qualify.9    (a) To obtain the benefits provided in this Division, the 10company shall apply in writing to the local municipality and 11taxing districts to enter into an incentive agreement with the 12municipality and taxing districts, in the form and manner 13required by the local municipality and taxing districts, 14respectively, and shall certify to the facts asserted in the 15application. 16    (b) The corporate authorities of the local municipality, 17prior to entering into an incentive agreement under this 18Section, shall hold a public hearing to consider the 19application. The amount and terms of the proposed special 20payment and the duration of the incentive agreement shall be 21considered at the public hearing. 22    (c) Copies of the completed application shall be provided 23to each taxing district for which property taxes were assessed 24on the property for the immediately preceding tax year. Those 25copies shall be provided at least 30 days prior to the   HB2403- 24 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1scheduled public hearing at which the corporate authorities of 2the local municipality will consider the application. 3    (d) The company, the local municipality, and the taxing 4districts shall enter into an incentive agreement requiring 5the special payment described in Section 10-925. The corporate 6authorities of the local municipality shall adopt an ordinance 7approving the incentive agreement. 8    (e) If an incentive agreement is not executed within 5 9years after the local municipality's adoption of an inducement 10resolution, expenditures incurred by the company more than 5 11years prior to the execution of the incentive agreement shall 12not qualify as part of the minimum investment. 13    (f) To be eligible to enter into an incentive agreement 14under this Division, the company must commit to a project that 15meets the investment and new job creation requirements set 16forth in the company's tax credit agreement or high impact 17business designation. In no event shall the company be 18required to invest less than $100,000,000 or create fewer than 19100 new full-time jobs.  20    (35 ILCS 200/10-925 new)21    Sec. 10-925. Contents of incentive agreement.22    (a) The incentive agreement under Section 10-920 must 23require the company to pay, or be responsible for the payment 24of, an annual special payment to the local municipality and 25the taxing districts, beginning with the first tax year for   HB2403- 25 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1which the assessment freeze under this Division is applied to 2the megaproject. The amount of the special payment shall be 3established by the local municipality and taxing districts in 4the incentive agreement and may be a fixed amount for the 5duration of the incentive period or may be subject to 6adjustment (downward or upward) based on factors memorialized 7in the incentive agreement.8    Unless the special payment is negotiated as a fixed 9payment for the duration of the incentive period, the parties 10shall conduct an impact analysis study on the megaproject 11every 5 years, and the special payment shall be adjusted based 12on the results of that study; provided, however, the 13adjustment shall not be less than the initial special payment 14adjusted for inflation as measured by the Consumer Price 15Index. 16    The portion of the special payment due to the local school 17districts shall be increased annually by the lesser of (i) 5% 18or (ii) the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price 19Index for the 12 months ending in September of the immediately 20preceding calendar year, and may be further increased or 21decreased every 5 years based on the results of the impact 22analysis study. 23    (b) The incentive agreement shall obligate the company to 24operate the megaproject at the designated project location for 25a minimum of 20 years.26    (c) The incentive agreement may contain such other terms   HB2403- 26 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1and conditions as are mutually agreeable to the local 2municipality, the taxing districts, and the company and are 3consistent with the requirements of this Division, including, 4without limitation, operational and additional job creation 5requirements.6    (d) In addition, all incentive agreements entered into 7pursuant to Section 10-920 must include, as the first portion 8of the document, a recapitulation of the remaining contents of 9the document, which shall include the following: 10        (1) the legal name of each party to the agreement;11        (2) the street address of the project and the property 12    subject to the agreement;13        (3) the agreed minimum investment, which shall not be 14    less than the investment amount required in the tax credit 15    agreement or high impact business designation;16        (3.5) the agreed number of new jobs to be created, 17    which shall not be less than the number of new jobs 18    required in the tax credit agreement or high impact 19    business designation; 20        (4) the term of the agreement;21        (5) a schedule showing the amount of the special 22    payment and its calculation for each year of the 23    agreement;24        (6) a schedule showing the amount to be distributed 25    annually to each taxing district, as set forth in the 26    incentive agreement;  HB2403- 27 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1        (7) any other feature or aspect of the agreement which 2    may affect the calculation of items (5) and (6) of this 3    subsection; and4        (8) the party or parties to the agreement who are 5    responsible for updating the information contained in the 6    summary document. 7    (35 ILCS 200/10-927 new)8    Sec. 10-927. Minimum job creation requirements.9    (a) The company must hire the same number of new full-time 10employees as is required in the company's tax credit agreement 11or high impact business designation, which in no event shall 12be less than 100. These new full-time employees must be hired 13to support the business operations of the megaproject and be 14located within the State of Illinois. 15    (b) A company may not satisfy the requirements of this 16Section by relocating jobs from one site in Illinois to 17another site in Illinois.  18    (35 ILCS 200/10-930 new)19    Sec. 10-930. Installment bills; distribution of special 20payments.21    (a) The local municipality shall prepare a bill for the 22company for each installment of the special payment according 23to the schedule set forth in paragraph (5) of subsection (d) of 24Section 10-925, or as modified pursuant to paragraph (7) of   HB2403- 28 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1subsection (d) of Section 10-925, and the company shall make 2direct payments to the affected taxing entities according to 3the schedule in paragraph (6) of subsection (d) of Section 410-925 or as modified in paragraph (7) of subsection (d) of 5Section 10-925. 6    (b) The company shall make direct payments of the special 7payment to the taxing districts associated with the 8megaproject within 30 days after receipt by the company of the 9bill prepared by the local municipality.10    (c) Misallocations of the special payments may be 11corrected by adjusting later distributions, but these 12adjustments must be made in the next succeeding year following 13identification and resolution of the misallocation. To the 14extent that distributions have been made improperly in 15previous years, claims for adjustment must be made within one 16year of the distribution. 17    (35 ILCS 200/10-937 new)18    Sec. 10-937. Termination of incentive agreement; automatic 19termination; minimum level of investment and new job creation 20required to remain qualified for assessment freeze.21    (a) The local municipality, the taxing districts, and the 22company may mutually agree to terminate the incentive 23agreement at any time. From the date of termination, the 24megaproject is subject to assessment on the basis of the 25then-current fair cash value.  HB2403- 29 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1    (b) An incentive agreement shall be terminated if the 2company fails to satisfy the minimum investment level or the 3job creation requirements provided in this Division. If the 4incentive agreement is terminated under this subsection, the 5megaproject is subject to assessment on the basis of the 6then-current fair cash value beginning in the tax year during 7which the termination occurs.8    (c) An incentive agreement shall terminate if, at any 9time, the company no longer has the minimum level of new job 10creation and investment as provided in this Division, without 11regard to depreciation. 12    (35 ILCS 200/10-938 new)13    Sec. 10-938. Megaproject administration. The 14administration of a megaproject shall be under the 15jurisdiction of the local municipality that approved the 16incentive agreement by ordinance. Each local municipality that 17approves an incentive agreement by ordinance shall, by 18ordinance, designate a Megaproject Administrator for the 19megaproject within its jurisdiction. A Megaproject 20Administrator must be an officer or employee of the 21municipality or county. The Megaproject Administrator shall be 22the liaison between the approving municipality or county, the 23Department, and the Department of Revenue. 24    (35 ILCS 200/10-940 new)  HB2403- 30 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1    Sec. 10-940. Megaproject applications; certification as a 2megaproject and revocation of certification.3    (a) The Department shall receive applications for 4megaproject certificates under this Division. The Department 5shall promptly notify the assessment officer when the 6Department receives an application under this Section. The 7Department's rules shall provide that an applicant may request 8preliminary approval of the megaproject before the project 9begins, before the applicant has entered into a fully executed 10incentive agreement with the local municipality and taxing 11districts, or before the project has been placed in service. 12    (b) An applicant for a megaproject certificate under this 13Division must provide evidence to the Department of a fully 14executed incentive agreement between the company, the local 15municipality, and the taxing districts as described in this 16Division. 17    (c) An applicant for a megaproject certificate under this 18Division must provide evidence to the Department of a fully 19executed project labor agreement entered into with the 20applicable local building trades council prior to the 21commencement of any demolition, building construction, or 22building renovation at the project. If the demolition, 23building construction, or building renovation begins after the 24application is approved, then the applicant must transmit a 25copy of the fully executed project labor agreement to the 26Department as soon as possible after the agreement is   HB2403- 31 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1executed. 2    (d) An applicant for a megaproject certificate under this 3Division must provide evidence to the Department that the 4company has established the goal of awarding 20% of the total 5dollar amount of contracts awarded during each calendar year 6by the company, that are related to the project, to 7minority-owned businesses. 8    (e) The Department shall approve an application for a 9megaproject certificate if the Department finds that the 10project meets the requirements of this Division. 11    (f) Upon approval of the application, the Department shall 12issue a megaproject certificate to the applicant and transmit 13a copy to the assessment officer and the Department of 14Revenue. The certificate shall identify the property on which 15the megaproject is located. 16    (g) For each calendar year following issuance of the 17megaproject certificate, until the minimum investment and new 18job creation requirements have been met and the megaproject 19has been placed in service, the company shall deliver a report 20to the Department on the status of construction or creation of 21the megaproject and the amount of minimum investment made in 22the megaproject during the preceding calendar year. If the 23Department determines, in accordance with the Administrative 24Review Law and the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, that 25a project for which a certificate has been issued has not met 26the minimum investment and job creation requirements of this   HB2403- 32 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1Division within the investment period, the Department shall 2revoke the certificate by written notice to the taxpayer of 3record and transmit a copy of the revocation to the assessment 4officer. 5    (h) If the local municipality notifies the Department that 6the incentive agreement between the company, the local 7municipality, and the taxing districts has been terminated, 8the Department shall revoke the certificate by written notice 9to the taxpayer of record and transmit a copy of the revocation 10to the assessment officer.  11    (35 ILCS 200/10-945 new)12    Sec. 10-945. Computation of valuation.13    (a) Upon receipt of the megaproject certificate from the 14Department, the assessment officer shall determine the base 15year valuation and shall make a notation on each statement of 16assessment during the assessment period that the valuation of 17the project is based upon the issuance of a megaproject 18certificate. 19    (b) Upon revocation of a megaproject certificate, the 20assessment officer shall compute the assessed valuation of the 21project on the basis of the then-current fair cash value of the 22property.  23    (35 ILCS 200/10-950 new)24    Sec. 10-950. Transfers of interest in a megaproject;   HB2403- 33 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1sale-leaseback arrangement; requirements.2    (a) Subject to the terms of the incentive agreement 3between the company, the local municipality, and the taxing 4district, ownership of or any interest in the megaproject and 5any and all related project property, including, without 6limitation, transfers of indirect beneficial interests and 7equity interests in a company owning a megaproject, shall not 8affect the assessment freeze or the validity of the 9megaproject certificate issued under this Division. 10Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the 11incentive agreement shall be a covenant running with the land. 12    (b) A company may enter into lending, financing, security, 13leasing, or similar arrangements, or a succession of such 14arrangements, with a financing entity concerning all or part 15of a project including, without limitation, a sale-leaseback 16arrangement, equipment lease, build-to-suit lease, synthetic 17lease, nordic lease, defeased tax benefit, or transfer lease, 18an assignment, sublease, or similar arrangement, or succession 19of those arrangements, with one or more financing entities 20concerning all or part of a project, regardless of the 21identity of the income tax or fee owner of the megaproject. 22Neither the original transfer to the financing entity nor the 23later transfer from the financing entity back to the company, 24pursuant to terms in the sale-leaseback agreement, shall 25affect the assessment freeze or the validity of the 26megaproject certificate issued under this Division, regardless   HB2403- 34 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1of whether the income tax basis is changed for income tax 2purposes. 3    (c) The Department must receive notice of all transfers 4undertaken with respect to other projects to effect a 5financing. Notice shall be made in writing within 60 days 6after the transfer, shall identify each transferee, and shall 7contain other information required by the Department with the 8appropriate returns. Failure to meet this notice requirement 9does not adversely affect the assessment freeze.  10    (35 ILCS 200/10-955 new)11    Sec. 10-955. Minimum investment by company affiliates. To 12be eligible for the benefits of this Division, a company must 13invest the minimum investment. Investments by company 14affiliates during the investment period may be applied toward 15the minimum investment under this Division regardless of 16whether the company affiliate was part of the project. To 17qualify for the assessment freeze, the minimum investment must 18be made in connection with the megaproject. 19    (35 ILCS 200/10-960 new)20    Sec. 10-960. Projects to be valued at fair cash value for 21purposes of bonded indebtedness and limitations on property 22tax extensions. Projects to which an assessment freeze applies 23pursuant to this Division shall be valued at their fair cash 24value for purposes of calculating a municipality's general   HB2403- 35 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1obligation bond limits and a taxing district's limitation on 2tax extensions. 3    (35 ILCS 200/10-965 new)4    Sec. 10-965. Abatements. Any taxing district, upon a 5majority vote of its governing authority, may, after the 6determination of the assessed valuation as set forth in this 7Division, order the clerk of the appropriate municipality or 8county to abate any portion of real property taxes otherwise 9levied or extended by the taxing district on a megaproject. 10    (35 ILCS 200/10-970 new)11    Sec. 10-970. Filing of returns, contracts, and other 12information; due date of payments and returns.13    (a) The company and the local municipality shall file 14notices, reports, and other information as required by the 15Department.16    (b) Special payments are due at the same time as property 17tax payments and property tax returns are due for the 18megaproject property.19    (c) Failure to make a timely special payment results in 20the assessment of penalties as if the payment were a 21delinquent property tax payment or return.22    (d) Within 30 days after the date of execution of an 23incentive agreement, a copy of the incentive agreement must be 24filed with the Department, the chief county assessment   HB2403- 36 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1officer, and the county auditor for the county in which the 2megaproject is located. 3    (35 ILCS 200/10-980 new)4    Sec. 10-980. Rules. The Department may issue rulings and 5adopt rules as necessary to carry out the purpose of this 6Division. 7    (35 ILCS 200/10-985 new)8    Sec. 10-985. Prohibition on multiple credits, exemptions, 9and freezes. An applicant for a megaproject certificate who 10qualifies for an assessment freeze under this Section is not 11entitled to any other property tax credits, exemptions, or 12assessment freezes relating to the megaproject. 13    (35 ILCS 200/10-987 new)14    Sec. 10-987. Building materials exemption for 15megaprojects. An applicant that is eligible for a megaproject 16certificate under this Division 22 of Article 10 is also 17eligible for the building materials exemption under Section 18605-1115 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 19    (35 ILCS 200/10-990 new)20    Sec. 10-990. Sports stadiums. An applicant is not 21eligible for a megaproject assessment freeze under this 22Section for the construction or development of a sports   HB2403- 37 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1stadium unless, prior to the approval of the megaproject by 2the Department, the General Assembly approves the megaproject 3by joint resolution. 4    (35 ILCS 200/10-995 new)5    Sec. 10-995. Tax Increment Financing districts. A project 6that is located and operated in a Tax Increment Financing 7(TIF) district or TIF designated area is not eligible for a 8megaproject assessment freeze under this Section. The 9agreement shall provide that the megaproject certificate is 10void if an area on which the megaproject is located is 11designated as a TIF district or TIF designated area. 12    (35 ILCS 200/10-1000 new)13    Sec. 10-1000. Invalidity. If all or any part of this 14Division is determined to be unconstitutional or otherwise 15unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, a company 16has 180 days from the date of the determination to transfer the 17megaproject's title to an authorized economic development 18authority that qualifies for property tax assessment under 19this Division. 20    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 21severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 232025.  HB2403- 38 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 605/605-1118 new4    35 ILCS 105/12from Ch. 120, par. 439.125    35 ILCS 110/12from Ch. 120, par. 439.426    35 ILCS 115/12from Ch. 120, par. 439.1127    35 ILCS 120/2-28 new8    35 ILCS 200/Art. 10 Div. 9    22 heading new10    35 ILCS 200/10-910 new11    35 ILCS 200/10-915 new12    35 ILCS 200/10-920 new13    35 ILCS 200/10-925 new14    35 ILCS 200/10-927 new15    35 ILCS 200/10-930 new16    35 ILCS 200/10-937 new17    35 ILCS 200/10-938 new18    35 ILCS 200/10-940 new19    35 ILCS 200/10-945 new20    35 ILCS 200/10-950 new21    35 ILCS 200/10-955 new22    35 ILCS 200/10-960 new23    35 ILCS 200/10-965 new24    35 ILCS 200/10-970 new25    35 ILCS 200/10-980 new  HB2403- 39 -LRB104 09082 HLH 19138 b1    35 ILCS 200/10-985 new2    35 ILCS 200/10-987 new3    35 ILCS 200/10-990 new4    35 ILCS 200/10-995 new5    35 ILCS 200/10-1000 new